Illinois, session 104th, SB3885.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Student-Athlete Fairness and Education (SAFE) Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds:8        (1) Student-athletes face unique risks related to 9    substances due to injury exposure, performance pressure, 10    and eligibility requirements for collegiate athletics. 11        (2) Brief, focused education can effectively reduce 12    substance-related harm when delivered by existing school 13    personnel using readily available resources.14        (3) Local school districts are best positioned to 15    determine the most effective delivery methods for their 16    communities.17        (4) Student safety is enhanced when education is 18    non-punitive and integrated into existing athletic 19    programming.20        (5) No new State bureaucracy or funding is necessary 21    to achieve meaningful student protection. 22    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:  SB3885- 2 -LRB104 19613 LNS 33062 b1    "Existing resources" means current school health 2curricula, free online materials from the National Collegiate 3Athletic Association, the National Federation of State High 4School Associations, the National Institute on Drug Abuse, the 5Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration, and 6other reputable sources.7    "Qualified presenter" means any school employee or 8approved volunteer with relevant expertise, including coaches, 9athletic trainers, health teachers, school counselors, or 10community health professionals.11    "Substances" means alcohol, cannabis, controlled 12substances, performance-enhancing drugs, and prescription 13opioids. 14    Section 15. Core requirement.15    (a) Each public high school shall ensure student-athletes 16receive substance education annually for at least 30 minutes 17per school year. Substance education sessions may be delivered 18in one session or multiple shorter sessions.19    (b) Schools may satisfy the substance education 20requirement through any of the following:21        (1) a pre-season team meeting led by a coach or 22    athletic director;23        (2) integration into an existing health or physical 24    education class;25        (3) a guest presentation during an athletics assembly;  SB3885- 3 -LRB104 19613 LNS 33062 b1        (4) an online module completion with discussion;2        (5) a parent-athlete meeting facilitated by athletic 3    staff; or4        (6) any combination of paragraphs (1) through (5). 5    Section 20. Content framework. Substance education 6sessions must address at least 2 of the following areas based 7on local priority in the school district:8        (1) Athletic safety, including:9            (A) how substances affect reaction time and injury 10        risk; and11            (B) sport-specific safety considerations.12        (2) Career protection, including:13            (A) National Collegiate Athletic Association 14        banned substance list basics;15            (B) how eligibility violations occur; and16            (C) name, image, and likeness contract 17        considerations.18        (3) Health and recovery, including:19            (A) injury-to-dependency awareness;20            (B) alternative pain management options; and21            (C) where to get help if needed.22    No specific curriculum is required. Schools may use 23existing materials or create its own. 24    Section 25. Student protections.  SB3885- 4 -LRB104 19613 LNS 33062 b1    (a) Student questions or disclosures during substance 2education sessions are confidential and shall not trigger 3disciplinary action or mandatory testing.4    (b) Standard mandatory reporting requirements for abuse, 5neglect, or imminent danger shall remain in effect.6    (c) Students requesting assistance must be connected to a 7school counselor or appropriate resource. 8    Section 30. Parental rights.9    (a) Schools must inform parents that substance education 10is part of athletic participation, with general topics 11described.12    (b) Parents may request their student-athlete be excused 13from substance education sessions for religious or 14philosophical reasons. A student who is excused from substance 15education must complete a brief alternative assignment, such 16as reading 2 articles on information listed under Section 20. 17There shall be no penalty for opting out.18    (c) Schools are encouraged to invite parents to substance 19education sessions or provide take-home materials. 20    Section 35. Funding.21    (a) Pursuant to Section 6 of the State Mandates Act, no 22State reimbursement is required for implementation of this 23Act.24    (b) Schools must use current staff during existing time,   SB3885- 5 -LRB104 19613 LNS 33062 b1such as team meetings or health classes. Schools may use free 2curriculum resources available from national organizations. A 3school may not hire new persons, award new certifications, or 4purchase new material to administer a substance education 5session.6    (c) The State Board of Education may compile a list of free 7resources on its website or share best practices from other 8school districts voluntarily. 9    (d) No mandate shall be created for new materials or 10programs to implement this Act. 11    Section 40. Accountability.12    (a) Athletic directors shall certify to the Illinois High 13School Association by October 15 each year that "We provided 14required substance education", in a one-page form that 15includes check boxes only. Detailed reports, student data, or 16other documentation are not required.17    (b) The Illinois High School Association shall post a list 18of compliant schools on its website. The Illinois High School 19Association shall post a separate list of noncompliant schools 20on its website.21    (c) There are no penalties for noncompliance, including 22fines, funding losses, or sanctions. 23    Section 45. Optional best practices. School districts are 24encouraged but not required to consider:  SB3885- 6 -LRB104 19613 LNS 33062 b1        (1) Extended substance education sessions by 2    increasing substance education sessions to 2 or 3 hours 3    annually for deeper coverage.4        (2) Certified instructors by using Use National 5    Athletic Trainers' Association-certified athletic 6    trainers or licensed counselors when available.7        (3) Universal access by offering substance education 8    to non-athlete students.9        (4) Parent sessions by hosting optional parent 10    education nights.11        (5) Peer mentorship by training senior athletes as 12    peer educators.13        (6) Mental health integration by connecting substance 14    education to broader wellness programming.15    The State Board of Education may recognize schools that 16voluntarily adopt multiple best practices under this Section 17as "Champion Schools". 18    Section 50. Nonpublic schools.19    (a) Nonpublic schools may choose to follow the standards 20set forth in this Act.21    (b) Nonpublic schools that participate in the Illinois 22High School Association must certify compliance if they 23participate in State athletic tournaments.24    (c) Nonpublic schools may not receive any grants for 25following the standards set forth in this Act but may access   SB3885- 7 -LRB104 19613 LNS 33062 b1the free resource list published by the State Board of 2Education under subsection (c) of Section 35. 3    Section 55. Limitations on requirements. Nothing in this 4Act shall be construed to require:5        (1) the creation of any new State agency or office;6        (2) any State funding, appropriation, or increase in 7    local taxation;8        (3) the purchase of specific curriculum, instructional 9    materials, or educational resources;10        (4) certification, licensure, or specialized training 11    of teachers or other personnel beyond those designated as 12    qualified presenters;13        (5) the submission of detailed reports, collection of 14    student data, or other administrative documentation beyond 15    the annual certification required under this Act;16        (6) testing, assessment, or formal evaluation of 17    student-athletes;18        (7) minimum instructor qualifications beyond those 19    defined as qualified presenters;20        (8) a prescribed delivery method, including whether 21    education occurs online, in-person, or through hybrid 22    methods;23        (9) integration of substance education programs with 24    other schools or school district programs;25        (10) attendance of parents or guardians at substance   SB3885- 8 -LRB104 19613 LNS 33062 b1    education sessions; or2        (11) disciplinary action, sanctions, or other 3    punishment for schools or students for noncompliance with 4    the provisions of this Act. 5    Section 60. Waiver.6    (a) If a school district believes compliance would create 7undue burden, the school district may request waiver from the 8State Board of Education.9    (b) The State Board of Education shall grant a waiver if a 10school district demonstrates:11        (1) extreme rural isolation, such as the nearest 12    qualified presenter being located over 50 miles from the 13    school district;14        (2) extraordinary emergency, such as a natural 15    disaster or school closure; or16        (3) other documented hardship.17    (c) A waiver granted under this Section is valid for one 18year. A school district must reapply for a waiver annually. 19    Section 65. Periodic review.20    (a) The State Board of Education may survey school 21districts every 3 years on implementation experiences.22    (b) The General Assembly shall review this Act by January 231, 2032.24    (c) Suggested focus questions for the State Board of   SB3885- 9 -LRB104 19613 LNS 33062 b1Education and the General Assembly include:2        (1) Are schools complying?3        (2) Are student-athletes safer?4        (3) Is this working without creating burden? 5    Section 70. Relationship to existing substance education 6programs or other requirements.7    (a) Schools with existing substance education programs on 8the effective date of this Act that meet or exceed 90 minutes 9annually are automatically in compliance with this Act.10    (b) This Act complements but does not replace concussion 11awareness requirements.12    (c) This Act neither requires nor prohibits school drug 13testing programs. 14    Section 75. Construction. This Act shall be liberally 15construed to minimize burden on schools while protecting 16student-athletes. 17    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 18severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202027.